Utah statutes.
72-7-302.   Damage to signs, warnings, or barriers -- Penalty.

(1)  A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor who willfully and unlawfully removes, defaces, or interferes with any highway sign, signal, notice, warning, or barrier.

(2)  A person who commits an offense under Subsection (1) that results in an injury to a person or damage to property is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

